District of Columbia statutes.
7-245

Civil penalties for unlawful use or disclosure.

(a)

(1)

A person who negligently uses or discloses health and human services information in a manner not authorized by this chapter or other District law shall be liable in an amount of $500 for each violation.

(2)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “negligently” means that a person guided by ordinary considerations should have known, and by exercising reasonable diligence would have known, that the use or disclosure was not authorized.

(b)

A person who willfully uses or discloses health and human services information in a manner not authorized by this chapter or other District law shall be liable in an amount of $1,000 for each violation.

(c)

This section shall not apply to disclosures of information authorized pursuant to other District law or to federal law.

Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 105, 57 DCR 7171
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 53(a), 59 DCR 6190

History

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 105 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 105 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 211(b) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).

Emergency Legislation